Georgia statutes. TITLE 45 Public Officers and Employees
CHAPTER 6 Powers and Duties Generally

45-6-1.
“Books, papers, and other office property” defined.

As used in this chapter, the term “books, papers, and other office property” shall include, but not be limited to, all books, plates, pictures, photographs, films, engravings, paintings, drawings, maps, newspapers, magazines, pamphlets, broadsides, personal papers, organization records, documents, letters, public records, and microforms; sound recordings; audiovisual materials in any format; magnetic or other tapes; electronic data processing records; artifacts; or other documentary, written, or printed material, regardless of physical form or characteristics belonging to, on loan to, or otherwise in the custody of any public office.

History.

Code 1933, § 89-605.1, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 567, § 1.

45-6-2.
Fiscal year for all state government units; accounting.

The fiscal year for this state and for all units of the state government shall commence on July 1 and end on June 30 of each year, and all public officers of this state shall keep their official accounts in accordance therewith. The fiscal year shall be uniform for all state departments, boards, bureaus, commissions, institutions, and other agencies.

History.

Ga. L. 1880-81, p. 29, § 1; Code 1882, § 79a; Civil Code 1895, § 202; Civil Code 1910, § 231; Code 1933, § 89-901; Ga. L. 1937, p. 456, §§ 1, 3.

Cross references.

Establishment of fiscal year for counties and municipalities, §

36-81-3

.

45-6-3.
Official reports to conform with fiscal year.

The year for official reports shall be coincident with the fiscal year, and it shall be the duty of the public officers of this state to make and publish in print or electronically annually their official reports for the period commencing on July 1 and ending on June 30 of each year, inclusive. All public officers shall conform to the fiscal year as established in Code Section 45-6-2 in reporting and recording the financial operations of their respective offices and departments.

History.

Ga. L. 1880-81, p. 29, § 2; Code 1882, § 79a; Civil Code 1895, § 233; Ga. L. 1903, p. 25, § 1; Civil Code 1910, § 268; Code 1933, § 89-902; Ga. L. 1937, p. 456, §§ 2, 4; Ga. L. 2010, p. 838, § 10/SB 388.

45-6-4.
Mailing of annual reports to General Assembly members.

Each state agency, authority, office, board, department, or official directed by law to file or electing to file an annual report shall notify each member of the General Assembly in the manner which the reporting entity deems to be most effective and efficient that such report is available upon request on or before June 1 of each year, unless another date is provided for by law.

Each state agency, authority, office, board, department, or official directed by law to provide or electing to provide the members of the General Assembly with any annual report, budget, or audit other than those referred to in subsection (a) of this Code section shall not be required to distribute copies of such materials to the members but shall notify the members of the availability of such materials in the manner which the reporting entity deems to be most effective and efficient.

Each state agency, authority, office, board, department, or official shall be required to furnish to any member of the General Assembly any such annual report, budget, or audit referred to in this Code section upon request of any member of the General Assembly.

History.

Ga. L. 1917, p. 998; Code 1933, § 40-1701; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1125, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 1036, § 29/SB 49.

45-6-5.
Source of powers of public officers generally; estoppel.

Powers of all public officers are defined by law and all persons must take notice thereof. The public may not be estopped by the acts of any officer done in the exercise of an unconferred power.

History.

Civil Code 1895, § 268; Civil Code 1910, § 303; Code 1933, § 89-903.

History of Code section.

This Code section is derived from the decision in Penitentiary Co. No. 2 v. Gordon,

85 Ga. 159

,

11 S.E. 584

(1890).

Cross references.

Liability of public agents on public contracts, §

10-6-88

.

Law reviews.

For survey article on local government law, see 59 Mercer L. Rev. 285 (2007).

For annual survey on local government law, see 61 Mercer L. Rev. 255 (2009).

45-6-6.
Office property kept by public officers subject to inspection.

All books, papers, and other office property kept by any public officer under the laws of this state may be copied or inspected subject to the requirements of Article 4 of Chapter 18 of Title 50.

History.

Laws 1831, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 196; Code 1863, § 16; Code 1868, § 14; Code 1873, § 14; Code 1882, § 14; Civil Code 1895, § 14; Civil Code 1910, § 14; Code 1933, § 89-601; Ga. L. 2012, p. 218, § 13/HB 397.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2012 amendment of this Code section, see 29 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 139 (2012).

45-6-7.
Duty of incumbent to deliver office property to successor — Generally.

When any office is vacated, it is the duty of the incumbent, when requested, to deliver all books, papers, and other office property to his qualified successor.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 166; Code 1868, § 161; Code 1873, § 172; Code 1882, § 172; Civil Code 1895, § 269; Civil Code 1910, § 304; Code 1933, § 89-602.

Cross references.

Provision in quo warranto judgment for delivery to proper officer of all books and papers belonging to the public office in question, §

9-6-66

.

45-6-8.
Duty of incumbent to deliver office property to successor — Retiring judicial or ministerial officers or state’s attorneys.

Upon retiring from office, all judicial officers, ministerial officers, or state’s attorneys who receive any books, papers, or other office property from the state shall deliver those materials over to their successors.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 170; Code 1868, § 165; Code 1873, § 176; Code 1882, § 176; Civil Code 1895, § 273; Civil Code 1910, § 308; Code 1933, § 89-606.

45-6-9.
Duty of incumbent to deliver office property to successor — When incumbent deceased or cannot be found.

If a vacancy occurs because of death or if the incumbent cannot be found at the time a demand is made, it shall be the duty of any person having possession or control of any books, papers, or other office property or any part thereof to deliver it to the successor; and any rights and remedies shall be the same against such person as against the officer who is deceased or cannot be found.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 167; Code 1868, § 162; Code 1873, § 173; Code 1882, § 173; Civil Code 1895, § 270; Civil Code 1910, § 305; Code 1933, § 89-603.

45-6-10.
Duty of incumbent to deliver office property to successor — Failure to comply; search for and seizure of office property.

At the time appointed or at any other time to which the matter may be adjourned after a copy of the show cause order had been personally served on the person refusing to deliver the books, papers, and other office property, the judge shall proceed to inquire into the circumstances. If it appears that the books, papers, and other office property are withheld, the judge must order the same delivered immediately to the successor and on failure of the person so ordered to comply, the judge shall issue a warrant, directed to any officer of the county or of the adjoining county authorized to make an arrest, to arrest such person and commit him to jail, where he shall remain until he complies with said order or is otherwise discharged by law. At the same time and in the same way the judge shall command such officer to search such places as may be designated in the warrant for the books, papers, and other office property and to seize and bring them before him or some other official authorized to preside. If it appears that the books, papers, and other office property belong to the office, the judge shall cause them to be delivered to the successor. The payment of costs is in the discretion of the court. These proceedings do not interfere with Code Section 45-6-14 on this subject.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 169; Code 1868, § 164; Code 1873, § 175; Code 1882, § 175; Civil Code 1895, § 272; Civil Code 1910, § 307; Code 1933, § 89-605; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 45.

45-6-11.
Duty of incumbent to deliver office property to successor — Proceedings by successor.

If any person shall neglect or refuse to deliver books, papers, or other office property after demand has been made, the successor shall make complaint to the judge of the probate court of the county or to the judge of the superior court of the circuit in which the person refusing resides or, if neither can be had, to the judge of the superior court of an adjoining circuit; and if such officer is satisfied from the oath of complainant or otherwise that books, papers, or other office property are being withheld, he shall grant an order requiring the person so refusing to show cause, on a day and at a place named in such order, why he should not be compelled to deliver over such property.

History.

Ga. L. 1853-54, p. 27, § 1; Code 1863, § 168; Code 1868, § 163; Code 1873, § 174; Code 1882, § 174; Civil Code 1895, § 271; Civil Code 1910, § 306; Code 1933, § 89-604.

45-6-12.
Duty of incumbent to deliver office property to successor — Director of Division of Archives and History to act as agent when office abolished or no successor appointed.

The director of the Division of Archives and History, or his or her designee, is authorized to act as agent for any public officer or his or her successor in office, or in those cases where the office is abolished or no successor is appointed or elected, to recover books, papers, and other office property in the manner provided in Code Sections 45-6-10 and 45-6-11. The director may initiate such action on his or her own volition and succeeds to all rights and remedies as the successor in office would normally have in the property.

History.

Code 1933, § 89-605.1, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 567, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 532, § 8.

45-6-13.
Duty of incumbent to deliver office property to successor — Liability for costs of office property upon failure to deliver.

Upon failure to deliver any books, papers, or other office property after demand has been made by the incoming officer, the retiring judicial or ministerial officer shall be liable for three times the initial cost of such books, papers, or other office property, to be retained out of his salary, if a salaried officer, or if not a salaried officer and the said amount has not been retained, he shall be subject to action and recovery by his successor in the name of the state.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 171; Code 1868, § 166; Code 1873, § 177; Code 1882, § 177; Civil Code 1895, § 274; Civil Code 1910, § 309; Code 1933, § 89-607.

45-6-14.
Duty of incumbent to deliver office property to successor — Failure to deliver office property.

After the expiration of his term, if any officer shall willfully and unlawfully withhold or detain from his successor the books, papers, or other office property belonging to his office or if he shall mutilate, destroy, take away, or otherwise prevent the complete possession by his successor of such books, papers, or other office property, then he shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Laws 1833, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, pp. 805, 806; Code 1863, § 4368; Code 1868, § 4406; Code 1873, § 4474; Code 1882, § 4474; Penal Code 1895, § 283; Penal Code 1910, § 287; Code 1933, § 89-9905.